Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 3
TUBERCULOSIS FREE AREAS

Sec.

§ 25-301. Petition of owners in area — Testing of cattle and other animals.

Whenever petitions signed by sixty percent (60%) or more of the cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae and camelidae owners, as designated by the last assessment rolls of the several taxing districts therein, who reside in any county, counties, or well-defined areas, which are segregated from other areas or separated from other areas by natural segregating boundary lines, such as mountain ranges, rivers or canyons, shall be presented to the department of agriculture, asking that all cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae and camelidae within such county, counties, or areas, be tested for tuberculosis, said department is hereby authorized to make such test in the manner prescribed in sections 25-215, 25-216, 25-222 and 25-229, Idaho Code.

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 1, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-301; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 1, p. 56.

§ 25-302. Appropriation of moneys.

The county commissioners of such county, counties, or areas, shall appropriate as much money as they deem necessary for the control and eradication of any infectious, contagious or communicable disease of livestock or other animals or the carrier of the cause of such disease, and such funds shall be used in cooperation with the state division or federal department of agriculture in testing animals and disposing of such diseased animals disclosed by such tests, as provided for in this act.

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 2, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-302; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 128, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 2, p. 56.

§ 25-303. Designation of free areas.

When all cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae in such county, counties, areas, or the entire state have been tested and the records of such test show the disease has been eradicated to a minimum of percent that the state division and federal department of agriculture in their regulations designate as free from disease, such county, counties, well-defined areas, or the entire state shall be designated as “tuberculosis free areas.”

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 3, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-303; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 129, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 3, p. 56.

§ 25-304. Bringing cattle or other animals into free area.

No cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae shall be brought into any tuberculosis free county, counties, or areas, after the tuberculosis test provided for herein shall have been completed therein, except in compliance with regulations promulgated by the state department of agriculture, division of animal industries, in cooperation with the county commissioners.

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 4, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-304; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 130, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 4, p. 56.

§ 25-305. Rules and regulations.

The state department of agriculture is hereby empowered and the division of animal industries shall be authorized to make, promulgate and enforce general and reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 5, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-305; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 131, p. 364.

§ 25-306. Violation of rules and regulations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this act or any rules and regulations made under and pursuant to the terms of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense.

History.

1923, ch. 146, § 6, p. 214; I.C.A.,§ 24-306; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 5, p. 56.

§ 25-307. Quarantine when owner refuses to permit test.

The director of the department or administrator of the Idaho division of animal industries, or any deputy of such division, shall have the power to place any cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae under quarantine when any owner or caretaker of such animals shall refuse to permit the tuberculin or other approved tuberculosis test to be applied to such animals in the manner provided in sections 25-301 through 25-306, Idaho Code. The notice of quarantine shall be in writing and any animals described therein shall not be transported or moved in any manner from the premises described in the quarantine notice. It shall be unlawful to sell, give away, offer for sale or transport any milk, milk products, or other products produced from the cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae described in such notice of quarantine. Such administrator or his deputy shall furnish one (1) copy of the quarantine notice to the owner or caretaker of the cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae; the original of which notice shall be placed in the hands of the sheriff of the county in which such cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae are situated, and it shall be the duty of the sheriff to enforce the quarantine in accordance with such notice. The quarantine shall be removed whenever a satisfactory test has been made of the cattle, other bovidae, captive cervidae, captive antilocapridae or camelidae described in said notice.

History.

1927, ch. 56, § 1, p. 69; I.C.A.,§ 24-307; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 132, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 6, p. 56.

§ 25-308. Violation of quarantine.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall violate any provisions of such quarantine shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense.

History.

1927, ch. 56, § 2, p. 69; I.C.A.,§ 24-308; am. 1993, ch. 15, § 7, p. 56.